Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [604.165] CAUSE OF ACTION FOR DISSEMINATION OF PERSONAL INFORMATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "family or household member" and "personal information" have the meanings given in section 609.5151. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Liability for dissemination of personal information. new text end new text begin A person who knowingly and without consent disseminates or makes publicly available, including but not limited to through the Internet, personal information about an individual or the individual's family or household member is liable for damages to the individual whose personal information disseminated if: new text end new text begin (1) the public availability of information poses an imminent and serious threat to the individual's safety or the safety of the individual's family or household member; and new text end new text begin (2) the person disseminating the information knows or reasonably should know of the imminent and serious threat. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Damages available; equitable relief. new text end new text begin (a) The court may award the following damages to a prevailing plaintiff from a person found liable under this section: new text end new text begin (1) actual and special damages, including damages for mental anguish; new text end new text begin (2) a civil penalty awarded to the plaintiff of an amount up to $10,000; and new text end new text begin (3) court costs, fees, and reasonable attorney fees. new text end new text begin (b) The court may also provide such equitable relief as it deems necessary or proper. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exceptions to liability. new text end new text begin (a) No person shall be liable under this section when the dissemination is: new text end new text begin (1) for the purpose of a criminal investigation or prosecution that is otherwise lawful; new text end new text begin (2) for the purpose of, or in connection with, the good faith reporting of unlawful conduct that the person making the report reasonably believes to have occurred; new text end new text begin (3) related to a matter of public interest and dissemination serves a lawful public purpose; new text end new text begin (4) made for legal proceedings and is consistent with common practice in civil proceedings necessary for the proper functioning of the criminal justice system, or protected by court order which prohibits any further dissemination; or new text end new text begin (5) authorized or required by state or federal law. new text end new text begin (b) This section does not alter or amend the liabilities and protections granted by United States Code, title 47, section 230, and shall be construed in a manner consistent with federal law. new text end new text begin (c) A cause of action arising under this section does not prevent the use of any other cause of action or remedy available under the law. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Jurisdiction. new text end new text begin A court has jurisdiction over a cause of action filed pursuant to this section if the plaintiff or defendant resides in Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Venue. new text end new text begin A cause of action arising under this section may be filed in: new text end new text begin (1) the county of residence of the defendant or plaintiff or in the jurisdiction of the plaintiff's designated address if the plaintiff participates in the address confidentiality program established by chapter 5B; new text end new text begin (2) the county where the dissemination occurred giving rise to the cause of action under subdivision 2; or new text end new text begin (3) the county where the disseminated personal information giving rise to the cause of action under subdivision 2 is stored. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Statute of limitations tolled. new text end new text begin In a civil action brought under this section, the statute of limitations is tolled until the plaintiff discovers the dissemination has occurred. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Confidential filings allowed. new text end new text begin To protect the privacy of the plaintiff in cases filed under this section, the court shall allow confidential or redacted filings and may issue protective orders as it deems necessary or proper. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to causes of action accruing on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.5151, is amended to read: 609.5151 DISSEMINATION OF PERSONAL INFORMATION deleted text begin ABOUT LAW ENFORCEMENTdeleted text end PROHIBITED; PENALTY. Subdivision 1. Definitions. As used in this section: (1) "family or household member" has the meaning given in section 518B.01, subdivision 2;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (2) "law enforcement official" means both peace officers as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, and persons employed by a law enforcement agency; and deleted text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end "personal information" means a home telephone number, personal cell number, personal email address, name of the deleted text begin official'sdeleted text end new text begin individual'snew text end minor child, photographs of the deleted text begin official'sdeleted text end new text begin individual'snew text end minor child, home address, directions to a home, or photographs of a home. Subd. 2. Crime described. (a) It is a misdemeanor for a person to knowingly and without consent make publicly available, including but not limited to through the Internet, personal information about deleted text begin a law enforcement officialdeleted text end new text begin an individualnew text end or deleted text begin an official'sdeleted text end new text begin the individual'snew text end family or household member, if: (1) the public availability of information poses an imminent and serious threat to the deleted text begin official'sdeleted text end new text begin individual'snew text end safety or the safety of deleted text begin an official'sdeleted text end new text begin the individual'snew text end family or household member; and (2) the person making the information publicly available knows or reasonably should know of the imminent and serious threat. (b) A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the person violates paragraph (a) and deleted text begin a law enforcement officialdeleted text end new text begin the individualnew text end or deleted text begin an official'sdeleted text end new text begin the individual'snew text end family or household member suffers great bodily harm or death as a result of the violation. (c) A person who is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end